Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.117.040

Identification of eligible students and applicants—Duties of institutions of higher education, the department of social and health services, and the department of children, youth, and families.

Effective operation of the passport to careers program requires early and accurate identification of former foster care youth and unaccompanied youth experiencing homelessness so that they can be linked to the financial and other assistance that will help them succeed in college or in a registered apprenticeship or recognized preapprenticeship. To that end:

(1) All institutions of higher education that receive funding for student support services under RCW 28B.117.030 shall include on their applications for admission or on their registration materials a question asking whether the applicant has been in state, tribal, or federal foster care in Washington state or experienced unaccompanied homelessness under the parameters in RCW 28B.117.030(3)(a), as determined by the office, with an explanation that financial and support services may be available. All other institutions of higher education are strongly encouraged to include such a question and explanation. No institution may consider whether an applicant may be eligible for a scholarship or student support services under this chapter when deciding whether the applicant will be granted admission.

(2) With substantial input from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall devise and implement procedures for efficiently, promptly, and accurately identifying students and applicants who are eligible for services under RCW 28B.117.030, and for sharing that information with the office, the institutions of higher education, and the nongovernmental entity or entities identified in RCW 28B.77.250, 28B.117.030(5)(e), and 28B.117.055. The procedures shall include appropriate safeguards for consent by the applicant or student before disclosure. This information retains its confidentiality under chapter 13.50 RCW and federal law and may not be further disclosed except as allowed under state and federal law.

(3) Nothing in this chapter allows the sharing of confidential information that is prohibited by state or federal law.

[ 2019 c 470 s 24; 2019 c 64 s 5; 2018 c 232 s 5; 2012 c 163 s 4; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 222; 2007 c 314 s 5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2019 c 64 s 5 and by 2019 c 470 s 24, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Explanatory statement—2019 c 64: See note following RCW 1.20.110.

Short title—2018 c 232: See note following RCW 28B.117.010.

Findings—Effective date—2012 c 163: See notes following RCW 28B.117.010.

Legislative recommendation—2012 c 163: See note following RCW 28B.118.010.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Expiration date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 220-225: See note following RCW 28B.117.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.